Alabama, session 2026rs, HB174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) As used in this act, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) ESRB. The Entertainment Software Rating Board.
(2) VIDEO GAME. Any electronic, interactive game played
using a specialized electronic gaming device, computer, smart
phone, tablet, or other electronic device and that is designed
Page 1

phone, tablet, or other electronic device and that is designed
HB174 INTRODUCED
to interact with a television, computer monitor, or other
electronic display screen.
(b) If 25 or more units of a video game have been sold
within this state, the manufacturer of the video game shall
ensure that, prior to the continued sale of the video game,
the game is rated by the ESRB or a similar nationally
recognized video game rating organization and has a suggested
level of age appropriateness.
(c) The manufacturer of a video game required to be
rated pursuant to this section shall do both of the following:
(1) Ensure that the video game rating required under
this section is physically printed onto the packaging of the
game, if physically sold in this state, or is otherwise
displayed in a conspicuous place at the point of purchase.
(2) Ensure that additional information describing why
the game has its rating is available on a website accessible
by consumers in the state.
(d) Any violation of this act shall be considered a
violation of the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, Chapter 19,
Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2